Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-205
Fugitive; apprehension and arrest.

If any person or persons who may be charged with the commission of a crime or offense made punishable by the laws of this state shall abscond or remove from the county in which such crime or offense is charged to have been committed, it shall be lawful for any sheriff or other person to apprehend the person or persons so charged, remove him, her, or them to the county in which the alleged crime may be said to have been committed, and deliver such person or persons to any magistrate in such county, who shall cause the person or persons so delivered to be dealt with as the law may direct.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 264, p. 785;

R.S.1913, § 8918;

C.S.1922, § 9939;

C.S.1929, § 29-205;

R.S.1943, § 29-205;

Laws 1988, LB 1030, § 22.

It is mandatory duty of sheriff, where warrant is placed in his hands issued in another county, to apprehend the accused and remove him to the county where the crime is charged. State ex rel. Johnson v. Goble, 136 Neb. 242, 285 N.W. 569 (1939).

A law enforcement officer investigating a crime has the authority to detain a suspect with an outstanding arrest warrant outside the law enforcement officer's primary jurisdiction. State v. Hill, 12 Neb. App. 492, 677 N.W.2d 525 (2004).